District of Columbia statutes.
1-624.21

Outplacement services for displaced employees in Fiscal Year 1996.

The outplacement services provided by the Mayor to employees displaced during Fiscal Year 1996 shall include provisions for the following:

(1)

Counseling services for stress and finance management;

(2)

Access to automated job information services;

(3)

Job fairs;

(4)

Coordination of training and job banks with the D.C. Chamber of Commerce, Business Coalition, and labor organizations;

(5)

Consulting with regional governments concerning job vacancies and job banks;

(6)

Workshops on writing resumes; and

(7)

Access to facsimile and copying machines, computers, typewriters, and telephones where local calls can be made to prospective employers.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2421
as added Mar. 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 601, 43 DCR 5
1981 Ed., § 1-625A.1.